Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 80.50.120 and 1977 ex.s. c 371 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to the conditions set forth therein any certification shall bind the state and each of its departments, agencies, divisions, bureaus, commissions, boards, and political subdivisions, whether a member of the council or not, as to the approval of the site and the construction and operation of the proposed energy facility.(2) The certification shall authorize the person named therein to construct and operate the proposed energy facility subject only to the conditions set forth in such certification.(3) The issuance of a certification shall be in lieu of any permit, certificate or similar document required by any department, agency, division, bureau, commission, board, or political subdivision of this state, whether a member of the council or not.(4) An action taken by a city or county is not subject to appeal under this chapter on the basis that the action is inconsistent with a code that has been preempted pursuant to RCW 80.50.110, where the action is taken under an agreement with the council to provide technical assistance or advice, or to conduct application or plan review, related to the construction or operation of a certified energy facility included under this chapter.--- END ---